src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_84LASKMA !!= * @CODE@ laskma:lask
!! * Yaml: __nwstma__
+V:%^WGStem%>õ BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:%^WGStem%>õ BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V: BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_vaq ;
+V:%^WGStem%>õ BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^WGStem V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V: BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG1_sõ ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG3_APOSTROPHE ;
+V: V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_sõ ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_vaq ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: BACK_INF_ma ;
+V:%>õ BACK_INF_ZEROq ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_VISKAMA-PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_85HIRNMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kakma:kaku hirnma:hirnu
!! * Yaml: __kakma__
+V:u BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:u BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:%{XC%} V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V: BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_vaq ;
+V:u BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;
+V: BACK_INF_ma ;
+V: BACK_INF_daq ;

LEXICON V_86JAHTʼMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ jahtʼma:jahti
!! * Yaml: __jahtjma__
+V: BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^VowRM V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V:%^VowRM BACK_IND-PRT-SC-12_õ ; !2014-06-27 Is this correct
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:%^VowRM BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG3_APOSTROPHE ;
+V:%^VowRM BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG3_õ ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_vaq ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V:%^VowRM BACK_INF_ma ;
+V: BACK_INF_ZEROq ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:%^VowRM BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V: BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_86ISTMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ istma:istu
!! * Yaml: __istma__
+V: BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^VowRM V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V:%^VowRM BACK_IND-PRT-SC-12_õ ; !2014-06-27 Is this correct
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:%^VowRM BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG3_APOSTROPHE ;
+V:%^VowRM BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG3_õ ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_vaq ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V:%^VowRM BACK_INF_ma ;
+V: BACK_INF_ZEROq ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:%^VowRM BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V: BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_86EHTʼMÄ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ehtʼmä:ehti
!! * Yaml: __V-ehtjmae__
+V: FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^VowRM V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V:%^VowRM FRONT_IND-PRT-SC-12_e ; !2014-06-27 Is this correct
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:%^VowRM FRONT_IND-PRT-SCSG3_APOSTROPHE ;
+V:%^VowRM FRONT_IND-PRT-SCSG3_e ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_väq ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V:%^VowRM FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V: FRONT_INF_ZEROq ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:%^VowRM FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_nüq ;
+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V: FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_87KOSIMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kosima:kosi
!! * Yaml: __V-kosima__
+V: BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V:a BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_vaq ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^VowRM BACK_IND-PRT-SC-12_õ ; 
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:%^VowRM BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG3_õ ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_vaq ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: BACK_INF_ma ;
+V:%^StrGStem BACK_INF_ZEROq ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V: BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_87KERIMÄ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kerimä:keri
!! * Yaml: __V-kerimae__
+V: FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V:ä FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_väq ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^VowRM FRONT_IND-PRT-SC-12_e ; 
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:%^VowRM FRONT_IND-PRT-SCSG3_e ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_väq ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V:%^StrGStem FRONT_INF_ZEROq ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_nüq ;
+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V: FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_88SIBAHAMA !!= * @CODE@ sibama:siba
!! * Yaml: __V-sibama88,sibahama__
+V:%^StrGStem BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:%>h%{XV%} BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:%^StrGStem V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V:%>h%{XV%} BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_vaq ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V: V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_si ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: BACK_IND-PRT-SC3_si ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: BACK_INF_ma ;
+V:%>h%{XV%} BACK_INF_ma ;
+V: BACK_INF_daq ;
+V:%^StrGStem BACK_INF_ZEROq ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V: BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_88JÜVÄHÄMÄ
!! * Yaml: __V-juevaemae88__
+V:%^StrGStem FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:%>h%{XV%} FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:%^StrGStem V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V:%>h%{XV%} FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_väq ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V: V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_si ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: FRONT_IND-PRT-SC3_si ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V:%>h%{XV%} FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V: FRONT_INF_däq ;
+V:%^StrGStem FRONT_INF_ZEROq ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_nüq ;
+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V: FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

!LEXICON V-89
!+V+WORK: # ;
!90
!manitsõma:mani
LEXICON V-manitsõma
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:dsõ # ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:tsõs # ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:dsi # ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:tsʼ # ;
+V+Inf:daq # ;
+V+Inf:tsaq # ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:nuq # ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:tsnuq # ;
+V+Pss+PrfPrc:t # ;
+V+Pss+PrfPrc:tsõt # ;

!! !INDICATIVE PRESENT SUBJECT CONJUGATION
LEXICON BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: BACK_K ;

+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>t BACK_K ;
+Use/NG+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>dõq BACK_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>miq BACK_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>tiq BACK_K ;
+Use/NG+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>dõq BACK_K ;
+Use/NG+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>t BACK_K ;
BACK_ACT-IND-CONNEGII ;

LEXICON FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: FRONT_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>t FRONT_K ;
+Use/NG+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>deq FRONT_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>miq FRONT_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>tiq FRONT_K ;
+Use/NG+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>deq FRONT_K ;
+Use/NG+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>t FRONT_K ;
FRONT_ACT-IND-CONNEGII ;

LEXICON BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SG1_ZERO_USUALLY-WEAK
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: BACK_K ;
 BACK_ACT-IND-CONNEGII ;
+Act+Imprt+Sg2: BACK_K ;

LEXICON FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SG1_ZERO_USUALLY-WEAK
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: FRONT_K ;
FRONT_ACT-IND-CONNEGII ;
+Act+Imprt+Sg2:	 FRONT_K ;

LEXICON BACK_ACT-IND-CONNEGII
+Act+Ind+ConNegII: BACK_K ;
+Use/NG+Act+Ind+ConNegII:%>q BACK_K ;
LEXICON FRONT_ACT-IND-CONNEGII
+Act+Ind+ConNegII: FRONT_K ;
+Use/NG+Act+Ind+ConNegII:%>q FRONT_K ;


LEXICON BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SG2_USUALLY-STRONG
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>t BACK_K ;
+Use/NG+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>dõq BACK_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>miq BACK_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>tiq BACK_K ;
LEXICON FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SG2_USUALLY-STRONG
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>t FRONT_K ;
+Use/NG+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>deq FRONT_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>miq FRONT_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>tiq FRONT_K ;


LEXICON V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: K ;

LEXICON BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_sõ
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>sõ K ;
LEXICON FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_se
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>se K ;

LEXICON BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_iaq
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>iaq K ;
LEXICON FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_iäq
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>iäq K ;

LEXICON BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_vaq
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>vaq BACK_K ;
LEXICON FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_väq
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>väq FRONT_K ;


LEXICON BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>s BACK_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>sõq BACK_K ;
LEXICON FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>s FRONT_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>seq FRONT_K ;

LEXICON BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG
!+Act+Ind+ConNegII: BACK_K ;
+Use/NG+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%-%{XV%}iq BACK_K ;
+Use/NG+Act+Ind+ConNeg:%>q BACK_K ;
+Use/NG+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%-i BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ no vowel or q

LEXICON FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG
!+Act+Ind+ConNegII: FRONT_K ;
+Use/NG+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%-%{XV%}iq FRONT_K ;
+Use/NG+Act+Ind+ConNeg:%>q FRONT_K ;
+Use/NG+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%-i FRONT_K ; !!= * @CODE@ no vowel or q
