src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
hankʼma:hankʼ V_86ISTMA  "" ;
helämä:helä V_88JÜVÄHÄMÄ  "" ;
hiuhkma:hiuhk V_85HIRNMA  "" ;
hormʼma:hormi V_86JAHTʼMA  "" ;
hunʼama:hunʼa V_88SIBAHAMA  "" ;
hutʼma:hutʼ V_86ISTMA  "" ;
hülpʼmä:hülpʼ V_86EHTʼMÄ  "" ;
inama:ina V_88SIBAHAMA  "" ;
jahtʼma:jahti V_86JAHTʼMA  "" ;
jorama:jora V_88SIBAHAMA  "" ;
juhtʼma:juhtʼ V_86ISTMA  "" ;
jurkʼma:jurki V_86JAHTʼMA  "" ;
juuskma:juusk V_84LASKMA  "" ;
jõlkma:jõlk V_85HIRNMA  "" ;
jüvämä:jüvä V_88JÜVÄHÄMÄ  "" ;
kahima:kahi V_87KOSIMA  "" ;
kahrʼma:kahri V_86JAHTʼMA  "" ;
kahrʼma:kahrʼ V_86ISTMA  "" ;
kebimä:kebimä V_87KERIMÄ  "" ;
kedsimä:kedsi V_87KERIMÄ  "" ;
kerimä:keri V_87KERIMÄ  "" ;
kiidsma:kiids V_85HIRNMA  "" ;
kitskma:kitsk V_85HIRNMA  "" ;
kitʼmä:kiti V_86EHTʼMÄ  "" ;
kliimʼmä:kliimʼ V_86ISTMA  "" ;
kloksʼma:kloksi V_86JAHTʼMA  "" ;
kludima:kludi V_87KOSIMA  "" ;
kohima:kohi V_87KOSIMA  "" ;
kopsʼma:kopsi V_86JAHTʼMA  "" ;
korama:kora V_88SIBAHAMA  "" ;
kraatʼma:kraatʼ V_86ISTMA  "" ;
kruuksma:krooksu V_85HIRNMA  "" ;
krõlʼma:krõli V_86JAHTʼMA  "" ;
kudima:kudi V_87KOSIMA  "" ;
kukma:kuk V_85HIRNMA  "" ;
kumama:kuma V_88SIBAHAMA  "" ;
kärpʼmä:kärpi V_86EHTʼMÄ  "" ;
kärämä:kärä V_88JÜVÄHÄMÄ  "" ;
kõdrima:kõdri V_88SIBAHAMA  "" ;
kõsʼama:kõsʼa V_88SIBAHAMA  "" ;
köbimä:köbi V_87KERIMÄ  "" ;
köhimä:köhi V_87KERIMÄ  "" ;
körtʼmä:körti V_86EHTʼMÄ  "" ;
laapʼma:laapʼ V_86ISTMA  "" ;
lakma:lak V_85HIRNMA  "" ;
larpʼma:larpi V_86JAHTʼMA  "" ;
lihtʼmä:lihti V_86EHTʼMÄ  "" ;
lirtsma:lirts V_85HIRNMA  "" ;
läbehemä:läbe V_88JÜVÄHÄMÄ  "" ;
läbemä:läbe V_88JÜVÄHÄMÄ  "" ;
lõbima:lõbi V_87KOSIMA  "" ;
lõustʼma:lõustʼ V_86ISTMA  "" ;
lõõtsma:lõõts V_85HIRNMA  "" ;
magama:maga V_88SIBAHAMA  "" ;
minkʼmä:minki V_86EHTʼMÄ  "" ;
mämämä:mämä V_88JÜVÄHÄMÄ  "" ;
märämä:märä V_88JÜVÄHÄMÄ  "" ;
määgʼmä:määgʼ V_86EHTʼMÄ  "" ;
mürämä:mürä V_88JÜVÄHÄMÄ  "" ;
müsimä:müsi V_87KERIMÄ  "" ;
mütskmä:mütskmä V_85HIRNMA  "" ;
nagama:naga V_88SIBAHAMA  "" ;
nesʼmä:nesʼ V_86EHTʼMÄ  "" ;
nibimä:nibi V_87KERIMÄ  "" ;
nobima:nobi V_87KOSIMA  "" ;
nosima:nosi V_87KOSIMA  "" ;
nudsima:nudsi V_87KOSIMA  "" ;
nusʼma:nusʼ V_86ISTMA  "" ;
närimä:näri V_87KERIMÄ  "" ;
närämä:närä V_88JÜVÄHÄMÄ  "" ;
näsimä:näsi V_87KERIMÄ  "" ;
nõidma:nõid V_85HIRNMA  "" ;
nõrama:nõra V_88SIBAHAMA  "" ;
nõutralisiirʼmä:nõutraliseeri V_86EHTʼMÄ  "" ;
nögimä:nögi V_87KERIMÄ  "" ;
nüdsimä:nüdsi V_87KERIMÄ  "" ;
nürämä:nürä V_88JÜVÄHÄMÄ  "" ;
ogima:ogi V_87KOSIMA  "" ;
otsʼma:otsi V_86JAHTʼMA  "" ;
palmʼma:palmʼ V_86ISTMA  "" ;
paukma:pauk V_85HIRNMA  "" ;
perimä:peri V_87KERIMÄ  "" ;
pinʼmä:pini V_86EHTʼMÄ  "" ;
plunksma:plunks V_85HIRNMA  "" ;
pogima:pogi V_87KOSIMA  "" ;
popsʼma:popsi V_86JAHTʼMA  "" ;
porama:pora V_88SIBAHAMA  "" ;
pruntʼma:pruntʼ V_86ISTMA  "" ;
punkʼma:punki V_86JAHTʼMA  "" ;
pusima:pusi V_87KOSIMA  "" ;
pusma:pus V_85HIRNMA  "" ;
pühkʼmä:pühki V_86EHTʼMÄ  "" ;
ran`daalʼma:randaalʼ V_86ISTMA  "" ;
rudsima:rudsi V_87KOSIMA  "" ;
ruuvʼma:roovi V_86JAHTʼMA  "" ;
räbimä:räbi V_87KERIMÄ  "" ;
rägämä:rägä V_88JÜVÄHÄMÄ  "" ;
rämʼmä:rämʼ V_86EHTʼMÄ  "" ;
rübimä:rübi V_87KERIMÄ  "" ;
sadovama:sadova V_88SIBAHAMA  "" ;
segämä:segä V_88JÜVÄHÄMÄ  "" ;
sinkʼmä:sinki V_86EHTʼMÄ  "" ;
suga`ritsʼma:sugaritsʼ V_86ISTMA  "" ;
suikma:suik V_85HIRNMA  "" ;
sõdima:sõdi V_87KOSIMA  "" ;
tahoma:taho V_88SIBAHAMA  "" ;
terämä:terä V_88JÜVÄHÄMÄ  "" ;
tiksʼma:tiksi V_86JAHTʼMA  "" ;
tirama:tira V_88SIBAHAMA  "" ;
tirtsʼmä:tirtsi V_86EHTʼMÄ  "" ;
togima:togi V_87KOSIMA  "" ;
tohtʼma:tohtʼ V_86ISTMA  "" ;
tralima:trali V_87KOSIMA  "" ;
tsebimä:tsebi V_87KERIMÄ  "" ;
tsolksma:tsolks V_85HIRNMA  "" ;
tsolʼma:tsoli V_86JAHTʼMA  "" ;
tsorama:tsora V_88SIBAHAMA  "" ;
tsurmʼma:tsurmʼ V_86ISTMA  "" ;
tsäbämä:tsäbä V_88JÜVÄHÄMÄ  "" ;
tsänimä:tsäni V_87KERIMÄ  "" ;
tsäpsʼmä:tsäpsi V_86EHTʼMÄ  "" ;
tsärämä:tsärä V_88JÜVÄHÄMÄ  "" ;
tumpʼma:tumpi V_86JAHTʼMA  "" ;
tuďoma:tuďo V_87KOSIMA  "" ;
tõrama:tõra V_88SIBAHAMA  "" ;
tündsämä:tündsä V_88JÜVÄHÄMÄ  "" ;
tüürʼmä:tüürʼ V_86EHTʼMÄ  "" ;
vahtʼma:vahtʼ V_86ISTMA  "" ;
vaugma:vaug V_85HIRNMA  "" ;
võlʼma:võli V_86JAHTʼMA  "" ;
